Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-2703
Veteran and Active Duty Supportive; designation; department; establish process; criteria; duties.

(1) The department shall establish a process for a postsecondary institution to apply to the director to be designated as Veteran and Active Duty Supportive.

(2) To be eligible to be designated as Veteran and Active Duty Supportive, a postsecondary institution shall meet at least five of the following criteria, with respect to its operations in this state:

(a) The institution shall have personnel specifically trained and assigned to work with military students and veteran students;

(b) The institution shall have a student organization that is dedicated to helping veterans, active duty military, and their families;

(c) The institution shall give college credit for certain types of military training;

(d) The institution shall have a military leave-of-absence policy;

(e) The institution shall have counseling and advising services for military students and veteran students;

(f) The institution shall have an accredited Reserve Officer Training Corps program;

(g) The institution shall have clearly identifiable on its website a listing of services provided to military students and veteran students; and

(h) The institution shall specially recognize military students and veteran students during graduation or in other ways which are intended to demonstrate the institution's respect for such students' service.

(3) The department shall maintain on its website a list of postsecondary institutions designated as Veteran and Active Duty Supportive pursuant to this section.

Laws 2019, LB486, § 3.